test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-panems_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - панемс: # Verb 'to bake' - full paradigm
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: панян
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: панят
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: пани
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: паттяма
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: паттяда
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: панихть

     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: панень
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: панеть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: панць
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: панеме
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: панеде
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пансть
     
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: панелень
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: панелеть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: панель
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: панелеме
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: панеледе
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: панельхть
     
     панемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: панть
     панемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: панеда
     
     панемс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg1: панезан
     панемс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg2: панезат
     панемс+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3: панеза
#     панемс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl1: панестама
#     панемс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl2: панестада
     панемс+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3: панест

#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1: паньцамак
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1: паньцамань
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1: паньцамасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1: паньцамазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: паття
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2: паттянза
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2: паттядязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2: паттядязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: паньца
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: паньцак
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: паньцы
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: паньцаськ
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: паньцасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: паньцазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1: паньцамасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1: паньцамазь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1: паньцамасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1: паньцамазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2: паттядязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2: паттядязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2: паттядязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2: паттядязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: паньцайне
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: паньцайть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: паньцыне
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: паньцаськ
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: паньцасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: паньцазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1: панемайть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1: панемань
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1: панемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1: панемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2: панихтень
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2: панензе
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2: панедязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2: панедязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: панине
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: панить
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: панезе
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: панеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: панесть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: панезь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1: панемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1: панемазь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1: панемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1: панемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2: панедязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2: панедязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2: панедязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2: панедязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: панине
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: панить
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: панезень
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: панеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: панесть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: панезь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: панелемайть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: панелемань
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: панелемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: панелемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: панелийхтень
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: панелензе
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: панеледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: панеледязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: панелине
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: панелить
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: панелезе
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: панелеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: панелесть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: панелезь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: панелемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: панелемазь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: панелемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: панелемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: панеледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: панеледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: панеледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: панеледязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: панелине
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: панелить
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: панелезень
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: панелеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: панелесть
     панемс+V+TV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: панелезь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: панть
     панемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: панеда
#
     панемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1: панемак
     панемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg1: панемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: паньк
     панемс+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: панесть
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg1: панендярясамак
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg1: панендярясамань
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg1: панендярясамасть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg1: панендярясамазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg2: панендярятя
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg2: панендярятанза
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg2: панендярятядязь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg2: панендярятядязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: панендяряса
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: панендярясак
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: панендярясы
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: панендярясаськ
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: панендярясасть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: панендярясазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl1: панендярясамасть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl1: панендярясамазь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl1: панендярясамасть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl1: панендярясамазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl2: панендярятядязь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl2: панендярятядязь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl2: панендярятядязь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl2: панендярятядязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: панендярясайне
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: панендярясайть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: панендярясыне
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: панендярясаськ
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: панендярясасть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: панендярясазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: панелемайть
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: панелемань
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: панелемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: панелемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: панелийхтень
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: панелензе
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: панеледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: панеледязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: панелине
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: панелить
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: панелезе
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: панелеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: панелесть
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: панелезь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: панелемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: панелемазь
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: панелемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: панелемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: панеледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: панеледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: панеледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: панеледязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: панелине
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: панелить
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: панелезень
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: панелеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: панелесть
     панемс+V+TV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: панелезь
#

     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: панендярялемайть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: панендярялемань
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: панендярялемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: панендярялемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: панендярялийхтень
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: панендярялензе
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: панендяряледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: панендяряледязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: панендярялине
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: панендярялить
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: панендярялезе
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: панендярялеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: панендярялесть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: панендярялезь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: панендярялемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: панендярялемазь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: панендярялемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: панендярялемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: панендяряледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: панендяряледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: панендяряледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: панендяряледязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: панендярялине
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: панендярялить
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: панендярялезень
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: панендярялеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: панендярялесть
     панемс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: панендярялезь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: панелексолемайть
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: панелексолемань
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: панелексолемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: панелексолемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: панелексолийхтень
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: панелексолензе
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: панелексоледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: панелексоледязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: панелексолине
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: панелексолить
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: панелексолезе
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: панелексолеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: панелексолесть
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: панелексолезь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: панелексолемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: панелексолемазь
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: панелексолемасть
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: панелексолемазь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: панелексоледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: панелексоледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: панелексоледязь
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: панелексоледязь
#
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: панелексолине
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: панелексолить
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: панелексолезень
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: панелексолеськ
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: панелексолесть
     панемс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: панелексолезь
#
